Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.525

Preapproval required from department of financial institutions—Application of section—Rules.

(1) This section does not apply to a home equity conversion mortgage or other federally administered reverse mortgage product. A proprietary reverse mortgage loan product may not be offered without preapproval by the department of financial institutions.

(2) The director may make rules regarding the preapproval process, and may require any documentation, information, standards, or data deemed necessary by the director. The director may disapprove any proprietary reverse mortgage loan products that contain or incorporate by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous, or misleading provisions or terms, or exceptions and conditions which unreasonably or deceptively affect the reverse mortgage contract. Additional grounds for disapproval may include, without limitation, the existence in the proprietary product of any benefits provided to the borrower that are contrary to public policy.

[ 2009 c 149 s 5.]